Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2106
Report.

The commission
shall prepare an annual report on scholarships awarded pursuant to the Access
College Early Scholarship Program Act and shall submit the report electronically to the Clerk
of the Legislature. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the number
and amount of scholarships awarded, the postsecondary educational institutions
attended by scholarship recipients, and information regarding the success
of scholarship recipients in the courses for which the scholarships were awarded.

Laws 2007, LB192, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB20, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 242.